Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2705
Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to section 43-2710.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 5.